Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.110

Expedited rule making to adopt the state hemp plan.

(1) The department must use expedited rule making to adopt the state hemp plan submitted to the United States department of agriculture. As allowed under this section, rule making by the department to adopt the approved hemp plan qualifies as expedited rule making under RCW 34.05.353. Upon the submittal of the plan to the United States department of agriculture, the department may conduct initial expedited rule making under RCW 34.05.353 to establish rules to allow hemp licenses to be issued without delay.

(2) On the effective date of rules adopted by the department regulating hemp production under chapter 15.140 RCW, a licensed hemp producer under this chapter may immediately produce hemp pursuant to chapter 15.140 RCW with all the privileges of a hemp producer licensed under chapter 15.140 RCW.

[ 2019 c 158 s 11.]